Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 41 COLORADO ENERGY IMPACT BOND ACT
40-41-115. Security interests in CO-EI property.

The creation, perfection, and enforcement of any security interest in CO-EI property to secure the repayment of the principal of and interest on CO-EI bonds, amounts payable under any ancillary agreement, and other financing costs are governed by this section and not by the "Uniform Commercial Code", title 4, to the extent of any conflict.

The description or indication of CO-EI property in a transfer or security agreement and a financing statement is sufficient only if the description or indication refers to this article 41 and the financing order creating the CO-EI property.

A security interest in CO-EI property is created, valid, and binding as soon as all of the following events have occurred:

The financing order that describes the CO-EI property is issued;

A security agreement is executed and delivered; and

Value is received for the CO-EI bonds.

Once a security interest in CO-EI property is created under subsection (3)(a) of this section, the security interest attaches without any physical delivery of collateral or any other act. The lien of the security interest is valid, binding, and perfected against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the person granting the security interest, regardless of whether such parties have notice of the lien, upon the filing of a financing statement with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall maintain a financing statement filed pursuant to this subsection (3)(b) in the same manner in which the secretary maintains and in the same record-keeping system in which the secretary maintains financing statements filed pursuant to article 9 of title 4. The filing of any financing statement pursuant to this subsection (3)(b) is governed by article 9 of title 4 regarding the filing of financing statements.

A security interest in CO-EI property is a continuously perfected security interest and has priority over any other lien, created by operation of law or otherwise, which may subsequently attach to the CO-EI property unless the holder of the security interest has agreed in writing otherwise.

The priority of a security interest in CO-EI property is not affected by the commingling of CO-EI property or CO-EI revenue with other money. An assignee, bondholder, or financing party has a perfected security interest in the amount of all CO-EI property or CO-EI revenue that is pledged for the payment of CO-EI bonds even if the CO-EI property or CO-EI revenue is deposited in a cash or deposit account of the electric utility in which the CO-EI revenue is commingled with other money, and any other security interest that applies to the other money does not apply to the CO-EI revenue.

Neither a subsequent order of the commission amending a financing order as authorized by section 40-41-105 (4), nor application of an adjustment mechanism as authorized by section 40-41-104 (2)(h), affects the validity, perfection, or priority of a security interest in or transfer of CO-EI property.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3330, § 26, effective May 30.

40-41-116. Sales of CO-EI property.

A sale, assignment, or transfer of CO-EI property is an absolute transfer and true sale of, and not a pledge of or secured transaction relating to, the seller's right, title, and interest in, to, and under the CO-EI property if the documents governing the transaction expressly state that the transaction is a sale or other absolute transfer. A transfer of an interest in CO-EI property may be created only when all of the following have occurred:

The financing order creating and describing the CO-EI property has become effective;

The documents evidencing the transfer of the CO-EI property have been executed and delivered to the assignee; and

Value is received.

Upon the filing of a financing statement with the secretary of state, a transfer of an interest in CO-EI property is perfected against all third persons, including any judicial lien or other lien creditors or any claims of the seller or creditors of the seller, other than creditors holding a prior security interest, ownership interest, or assignment in the CO-EI property previously perfected in accordance with this subsection (1) or section 40-41-115. The secretary of state shall maintain a financing statement filed pursuant to this subsection (1)(b) in the same manner in which the secretary maintains and in the same record-keeping system in which the secretary maintains financing statements filed pursuant to article 9 of title 4. The filing of any financing statement pursuant to this subsection (1)(b) is governed by article 9 of title 4 regarding the filing of financing statements.

The characterization of a sale, assignment, or transfer as an absolute transfer and true sale and the corresponding characterization of the property interest of the assignee is not affected or impaired by the existence or occurrence of any of the following:

Commingling of CO-EI revenue with other money;

The retention by the seller of:

A partial or residual interest, including an equity interest, in the CO-EI property, whether direct or indirect, or whether subordinate or otherwise; or

The right to recover costs associated with taxes, franchise fees, or license fees imposed on the collection of CO-EI revenue;

Any recourse that the purchaser may have against the seller;

Any indemnification rights, obligations, or repurchase rights made or provided by the seller;

An obligation of the seller to collect CO-EI revenues on behalf of an assignee;

The treatment of the sale, assignment, or transfer for tax, financial reporting, or other purposes;

Any subsequent financing order amending a financing order as authorized by section 40-41-105 (4); or

Any application of an adjustment mechanism as authorized by section 40-41-104 (2)(h).

Source:

Entire article added, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3331, § 26, effective May 30.